src/fst/morphology/affixes/Der_vv_IV.lexc
LEXICON Der_vv_IV_additive
+GAJUP+Der/vv:g5ajup IV-mod_C ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:g5ajukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:g5ajukkunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:g5ajunnar IV-mod_nar ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:g5ajunnarneru IV-mod_V ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:g5ajunneru IV-mod_V ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:g5ajunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:g5ajunngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:g5ajunngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:g5ajussinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:g5ajussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:g5ajuppallaar IV-mod_C ;
+GAJUP+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:g5ajuppallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv:gallar IV-mod_gallar ; !PL20210708 nyt lex for både at sikre "normale" endelser yderligere uiguutit uden at miste de specielle Imp mv. ved GALLAR
+GALLAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:gallari XIgujoqX ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:gallaruma IV-mod_V ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv:gallarnaviar IV-mod_r ; !24032020 panie
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:gallarnaviarunar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gallarnaviarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:gallarnaviarunanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:gallarniar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gallarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:gallanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:galla%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:gallaqqu HTR_V_SAQ_si ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:gallareernikuu IV-mod_V ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:gallareersima IV-mod_V ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:gallarsima IV-mod_V ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:gallarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:gallassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:gallassannguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gallassannguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv:gallartariaqar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gallartariaqaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALLAR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:gallartip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:galuari XIgujoqX ; !Ondi 180422
+GALUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:galuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+LLAARE+Der/vv:galuaannallaar IV-mod_schwa ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv:galuallar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuallaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+MI+Der/vv:galuarmi XImioqX ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:galuarnar IV-mod_nar ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:galuarnari XIgujoqX ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:galuangaar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:galuarniar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:galuarnikuu IV-mod_V ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:galuarnerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:galuanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv:galuarpalup IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:galua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+GALUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:galuariar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv:galuaruttor IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:galuarsima IV-mod_V ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:galuarsimanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:galuarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:galuarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuarsinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:galuassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:galuassa%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+GALUAR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:galuartip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv:galuttuar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuttuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:galuttuinnar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:galuttuinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:galuttuinnassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:galuttua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+GASUAR+Der/vv:gasuar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:gasuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gasuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:gasuaannarniar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gasuaannarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:gasuarniar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gasuarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:gasuariar IV-mod_C ;
+GASUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:gasuariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv:nar IV-mod_nar ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:naraluassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GE+Der/vv:nar Saq_schwa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GE+Der/vv+Gram/TV+QE+Der/vv:nare%TRUNCq TV-mod_qe ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GE+Der/vv+TAR+Der/vv:narisar Gaq ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GE+Der/vv+TAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:narisarunar Gaq ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:narunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:narunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:naruna%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:narunartig flex-iv_schwa ; 
+NAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:narunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+NAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:narunnaaqqu HTR_V_SAQ_si ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:naannar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:naannaraluariar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:naannarunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv:naannarusup IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannarusukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:naannangajap IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannangajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:naannarniar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:naannarnianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:naannanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:naanna%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:naannaqqu DOTR_IV_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:naannariar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:naannarsima IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:naannarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:naannarsinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:naannassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv:naannartariaarup IV-mod_ute ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:naannartariaarukkallar gallar-iv ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannartariaarukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:naannartariaarukkunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannartariaarukkunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nannartariaarutinngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:naannartariaarussima IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:naannartariaarussinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAARUTE+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:naannartariaarutissa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv:naannartariaqar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:naannartariaqarallar gallar-iv ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannartariaqaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:naannartariaqarunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naannartariaqarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nannartariaqanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:naannartariaqarsima IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:naannartariaqarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:naannartariaqassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:naannavip IV-mod_iC ;
+NAR+Der/vv+IT+Der/vv:naap IV_it_GALUAQ_gennemgang ;
+NAR+Der/vv+IT+Der/vv+LLI+Der/vv:naalli IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+IT+Der/vv+LLI+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv:naalliartor IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+IT+Der/vv+LLI+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:naalliartoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KASIP+Der/vv:nakasip IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KASIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakasikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUJUP+Der/vv:nakujup IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUJUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakujukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KULUP+Der/vv:nakulup IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KULUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakulukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KULUP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nakulo%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv:nakusoor IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusooraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:nakusooraluari XIgujoqX ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nakusooralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv:nakusooriartor IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusooriartoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:nakusooriartuinnar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusooriartuinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:nakusoorunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusoorunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+KANNIR+Der/vv:nakusuukanner XIiX ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+KANNIR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nakusuukannersinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:nakusoorluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusoorluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nakusoorluinnarsima IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:nakusoornerar Gaq ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nakusoo%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nakusoorsima IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:nakusoorsimagunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusoorsimagunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:nakusoorsimagunavip IV-mod_iC ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nakusoorsimassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nakusoorsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nakusuussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:nakusuussagunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusuussagunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:nakusoortip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:nakusuuvip IV-mod_iC ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:nakusuuvikkunar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+KUSUUR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nakusuuvikkunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:nalaar IV-mod_laar ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:nalaangaar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nalaangaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nalaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nalaanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv:narluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:narluaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:narluinnar IV-mod_C ;
